Utah statutes.
58-83-502.   Unprofessional conduct.

"Unprofessional conduct" includes, in addition to the definition in Section 58-1-501 and as may be further defined by administrative rule:

(1)  online prescribing, dispensing, or facilitation with respect to a person under the age of 18 years;

(2)  using the name or official seal of the state, the Utah Department of Commerce, or the Utah Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing, or their boards, in an unauthorized manner;

(3)  failing to respond promptly to a request by the division for information including:

(a)  an audit of the website; or

(b)  records of the online prescriber, the Internet facilitator, or the online contract pharmacy;

(4)  using an online prescriber, online contract pharmacy, or Internet facilitator without approval of the division;

(5)  failing to inform a patient of the patient's freedom of choice in selecting who will dispense a prescription in accordance with Subsection 58-83-305(1)(n);

(6)  failing to keep the division informed of the name and contact information of the Internet facilitator or online contract pharmacy; and

(7)  violating the dispensing and labeling requirements of Section 58-17b-309.



Amended by Chapter 344, 2012 General Session

